California, session 20252026, AB1363.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares that subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 6380 of the Family Code impose a mandatory duty on the superior court to transmit a protective order issued pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 6200) of the Family Code, with the exception of an order issued pursuant to Section 6271 of the Family Code, to the Department of Justice directly or through a law enforcement designee.SEC. 2. Section 6380.5 is added to the Family Code, to read:6380.5. (a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as Wyland’s Law.(b) Subject to an appropriation by the Legislature, the department may establish, or contract with a vendor to establish, an automated protected person information and notification system to provide a petitioner or protected person in a protective order case with automated access to information maintained in the California Restraining and Protective Order System about their case, which shall include all of the following:(1) Whether the department has received a record of the protective order.(2) If the protective order has been successfully served on the restrained person.(3) Notwithstanding any other law, if the restrained person has violated the protective order by attempting to purchase or acquire a firearm or ammunition while the order is in effect.(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a record demonstrating whether the superior court has fulfilled its transmission obligations pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 6380 is required to be open to public inspection and copying.(2) Notwithstanding any other law, a record demonstrating receipt of information about a protective order that the department maintains is a public record that is not exempt from disclosure in response to a public record request made pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).(3) Paragraph (2) of this subdivision does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law.(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Department” means the Department of Justice.(2) “Protective order” includes all order types listed in Section 6380 and the reissuance, extension, modification, or termination of the order.